Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 10
REGULATED MARIJUANA

Editor's note:

This article 10 was added with relocations in 2020. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 10, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the medical marijuana program and medical review board, see § 25-1.5-106.

Law reviews:

For article, "The New, More Regulated Frontier for Medical Marijuana", see 39

C

olo. Law. 29 (Nov. 2010); for article, "

C

olorado's Emerging Medical Marijuana Legal Framework and Constitutional Rights", see 40 Colo. Law. 69 (Nov. 2011); for article, "Employment Law and Medical Marijuana: An Uncertain Relationship", see 41 Colo. Law. 57 (Jan. 2012); for article, "Amendment 64: Five Years Later", see 46 Colo. Law. 34 (Oct. 2017); for article, "Colorado Marijuana Regulation Five Years Later: Have We Learned Anything at All?", see 96 Denv. L. Rev. 221 (2019); for article, "Risking a Contact High: The Tenth Circuit's Failure to Defer to Colorado's Marijuana Laws", see 98 Denv. L. Rev. 265 (2021).

Section

PART 1 COLORADO MARIJUANA CODE

PART 2 STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY

PART 3 LICENSING PROCEDURES

PART 4 LICENSE TYPES

PART 5 MEDICAL MARIJUANA LICENSE TYPES

PART 6 RETAIL MARIJUANA LICENSE TYPES

PART 7 UNLAWFUL ACTS

PART 8 FEES

PART 9 DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS

PART 10 INSPECTION OF BOOKS AND RECORDS

PART 11 JUDICIAL REVIEW

PART 12 RESPONSIBLE VENDOR STANDARDS

PART 13 SEVERABILITY

PART 14 SUNSET REVIEW - ARTICLE REPEAL